05_Project/verbs.lexc
LEXICON V-prendre
%<c3%>%<inf%>: prend%>re #;							! infinitive
%<c3%>%<pres%>%<part%>: pren%>ant #;				! present participle
%<c3%>%<past%>%<part%>: pris Adj;					! past participle

%<c3%>%<pres%>%<indic%>%<1p%>%<sg%>: prend%>s #;	! present indicative
%<c3%>%<pres%>%<indic%>%<2p%>%<sg%>: prend%>s #;	! present indicative
%<c3%>%<pres%>%<indic%>%<3p%>%<sg%>: prend #;		! present indicative
%<c3%>%<pres%>%<indic%>%<2p%>%<pl%>: pren%>ez #;	! present indicative
%<c3%>%<pres%>%<indic%>%<3p%>%<pl%>: prenn%>ent #;	! present indicative

%<c3%>%<imperf%>%<indic%>: pren V-ImperfIndic-re;	! imperfect indicative
%<c3%>%<imperf%>%<indic%>%<3p%>%<sg%>: prend%>ait #;	! present subjunctive

%<c3%>%<fut%>%<indic%>: prend%>r V-FutIndic;		! future indicative simple
%<c3%>%<pres%>%<subj%>%<2p%>%<sg%>: prenn%>es #;	! present subjunctive
%<c3%>%<pres%>%<cond%>: prend%>r V-ImperfIndic-re;	! present conditional

%<c3%>%<pres%>%<subj%>%<1p%>%<sg%>: prenn%>e #;		! present subjunctive
%<c3%>%<pres%>%<subj%>%<2p%>%<sg%>: prenn%>es #;	! present subjunctive
%<c3%>%<pres%>%<subj%>%<3p%>%<sg%>: prenn%>e #;		! present subjunctive
%<c3%>%<pres%>%<subj%>%<2p%>%<pl%>: pren%>iez #;	! present subjunctive
%<c3%>%<pres%>%<subj%>%<3p%>%<pl%>: prenn%>ent #;	! present subjunctive

%<c3%>%<imperf%>%<subj%>: priss V-ImperfSubj;		! imperfect subjunctive
%<c3%>%<imperf%>%<subj%>%<3p%>%<sg%>: prît #;		! imperfect subjunctive

%<c3%>%<imper%>%<2p%>%<sg%>: prend%>s #;			! imperative
%<c3%>%<imper%>%<2p%>%<pl%>: pren%>ez #;

LEXICON V-pouvoir
%<c4%>%<inf%>: pouv%>oir #;							! infinitive
%<c4%>%<pres%>%<part%>: pouv%>ant #;				! present participle
%<c4%>%<past%>%<part%>: pu Adj;						! past participle

%<c4%>%<pres%>%<indic%>%<1p%>%<sg%>: peu%>x #;		! present indicative
%<c4%>%<pres%>%<indic%>%<2p%>%<sg%>: puis #;		! present indicative -- Conwell cites this as 2P
%<c4%>%<pres%>%<indic%>%<2p%>%<sg%>: peu%>x #;		! present indicative
%<c4%>%<pres%>%<indic%>%<3p%>%<sg%>: peu%>t #;		! present indicative
%<c4%>%<pres%>%<indic%>%<3p%>%<pl%>: pouv%>ons #;	! present indicative
%<c4%>%<pres%>%<indic%>%<2p%>%<pl%>: pouv%>ez #;	! present indicative
%<c4%>%<pres%>%<indic%>%<3p%>%<pl%>: peuv%>ent #;	! present indicative

%<c4%>%<imperf%>%<indic%>: pouv V-ImperfIndic-re;	! imperfect indicative
%<c4%>%<fut%>%<indic%>: pour%>r V-FutIndic;			! future indicative simple

%<c4%>%<pres%>%<cond%>: pour%>r V-ImperfIndic-re;	! present conditional

%<c4%>%<pres%>%<subj%>: puiss V-PresSubj;			! present subjunctive

%<c4%>%<imperf%>%<subj%>: puss V-ImperfSubj;		! imperfect subjunctive
%<c4%>%<imperf%>%<subj%>%<3p%>%<sg%>: pût #;		! imperfect subjunctive

LEXICON V-savoir
%<c4%>%<inf%>: sav%>oir #;							! infinitive
%<c4%>%<pres%>%<part%>: sach%>ant #;				! present participle
%<c4%>%<past%>%<part%>: su Adj;						! past participle

%<c4%>%<pres%>%<indic%>: sai V-PresIndic-SG-re;		! present indicative
%<c4%>%<pres%>%<indic%>: sav V-PresIndic-PL;		! present indicative
%<c4%>%<imperf%>%<indic%>: sav V-ImperfIndic;		! imperfect indicative
%<c4%>%<fut%>%<indic%>: sau%>r V-FutIndic;			! future indicative simple

%<c4%>%<pres%>%<cond%>: sau%>r V-ImperfIndic;		! present conditional

%<c4%>%<pres%>%<subj%>: sach V-PresSubj;		! present subjunctive
%<c4%>%<imperf%>%<subj%>: suss V-ImperfSubj;	! imperfect subjunctive
%<c4%>%<imperf%>%<subj%>%<3p%>%<sg%>: sût #;	! imperfect subjunctive

%<c4%>%<imper%>: sach V-Imperative-er;				! imperative

LEXICON V-sortir
%<c2%>%<inf%>: %>ir #;							! infinitive
%<c2%>%<pres%>%<part%>: %>ant #;				! present participle
%<c2%>%<past%>%<part%>: %>i Adj;				! past participle

%<c2%>%<pres%>%<indic%>: V-PresIndic-SG-re;		! present indicative
%<c2%>%<pres%>%<indic%>: V-PresIndic-PL;		! present indicative
%<c2%>%<imperf%>%<indic%>: V-ImperfIndic;		! imperfect indicative
%<c2%>%<fut%>%<indic%>: %>ir V-FutIndic;		! future indicative simple

%<c2%>%<pres%>%<cond%>: %>ir V-ImperfIndic;		! present conditional
%<c2%>%<pres%>%<subj%>: V-PresSubj;				! present subjunctive
%<c2%>%<imperf%>%<subj%>: %>iss V-ImperfSubj;	! imperfect subjunctive
%<c2%>%<imperf%>%<subj%>%<3p%>%<sg%>: %>ît #;	! imperfect subjunctive

%<c2%>%<imper%>: V-Imperative-ir;				! imperative

LEXICON V-tenir

%<c2%>%<inf%>: ten%>ir #;							! infinitive
%<c2%>%<pres%>%<part%>: ten%>ant #;					! present participle
%<c2%>%<past%>%<part%>: ten%>u Adj;					! past participle

%<c2%>%<pres%>%<indic%>: tien V-PresIndic-SG-re;	! present indicative
%<c2%>%<pres%>%<indic%>%<2p%>%<pl%>: ten%>ez #;		! present indicative
%<c2%>%<pres%>%<indic%>%<3p%>%<pl%>: tienn%>ent #;	! present indicative

%<c2%>%<imperf%>%<indic%>: ten V-ImperfIndic-re;	! imperfect indicative
%<c2%>%<fut%>%<indic%>: tiend%>r V-FutIndic;		! future indicative simple

%<c2%>%<pres%>%<cond%>: tiend%>r V-ImperfIndic-re;	! present conditional

%<c2%>%<pres%>%<subj%>%<1p%>%<sg%>: tienn%>e #;		! present subjunctive
%<c2%>%<pres%>%<subj%>%<2p%>%<sg%>: tienn%>es #;	! present subjunctive
%<c2%>%<pres%>%<subj%>%<3p%>%<sg%>: tienn%>e #;		! present subjunctive
%<c2%>%<pres%>%<subj%>%<2p%>%<pl%>: ten%>iez #;		! present subjunctive
%<c2%>%<pres%>%<subj%>%<3p%>%<pl%>: tienn%>ent #;	! present subjunctive

%<c2%>%<imperf%>%<subj%>: tinss V-ImperfSubj;		! imperfect subjunctive
%<c2%>%<imperf%>%<subj%>%<3p%>%<sg%>: tînt #;		! imperfect subjunctive

%<c2%>%<imper%>%<2p%>%<sg%>: tiend%>s #;			! imperative
%<c2%>%<imper%>%<2p%>%<pl%>: ten%>ez #;

LEXICON V-venir

%<c2%>%<inf%>: ven%>ir #;							! infinitive
%<c2%>%<pres%>%<part%>: ven%>ant #;					! present participle
%<c2%>%<past%>%<part%>: ven%>u Adj;					! past participle

%<c2%>%<pres%>%<indic%>: vien V-PresIndic-SG-re;	! present indicative
%<c2%>%<pres%>%<indic%>%<2p%>%<pl%>: ven%>ez #;		! present indicative
%<c2%>%<pres%>%<indic%>%<3p%>%<pl%>: vienn%>ent #;	! present indicative

%<c2%>%<imperf%>%<indic%>: ven V-ImperfIndic-re;	! imperfect indicative
%<c2%>%<fut%>%<indic%>: viend%>r V-FutIndic;		! future indicative simple

%<c2%>%<pres%>%<cond%>: viend%>r V-ImperfIndic-re;	! present conditional

%<c2%>%<pres%>%<subj%>%<1p%>%<sg%>: vienn%>e #;		! present subjunctive
%<c2%>%<pres%>%<subj%>%<2p%>%<sg%>: vienn%>es #;	! present subjunctive
%<c2%>%<pres%>%<subj%>%<3p%>%<sg%>: vienn%>e #;		! present subjunctive
%<c2%>%<pres%>%<subj%>%<2p%>%<pl%>: ven%>iez #;		! present subjunctive
%<c2%>%<pres%>%<subj%>%<3p%>%<pl%>: vienn%>ent #;	! present subjunctive

%<c2%>%<imperf%>%<subj%>: vinss V-ImperfSubj;		! imperfect subjunctive
%<c2%>%<imperf%>%<subj%>%<3p%>%<sg%>: vînt #;		! imperfect subjunctive

%<c2%>%<imper%>%<2p%>%<sg%>: viend%>s #;			! imperative
%<c2%>%<imper%>%<2p%>%<pl%>: ven%>ez #;

LEXICON V-voir
%<c4%>%<inf%>: oir #;								! infinitive
%<c4%>%<pres%>%<part%>: oy%>ant #;					! present participle
%<c4%>%<past%>%<part%>: u Adj;						! past participle

%<c4%>%<pres%>%<indic%>: oi V-PresIndic-SG-re;		! present indicative
%<c4%>%<pres%>%<indic%>%<2p%>%<pl%>: oy%>ez #;		! present indicative
%<c4%>%<pres%>%<indic%>%<3p%>%<pl%>: oi%>ent #;		! present indicative

%<c4%>%<imperf%>%<indic%>: oy V-ImperfIndic-re;		! imperfect indicative
%<c4%>%<fut%>%<indic%>: er%>r V-FutIndic;			! future indicative simple

%<c4%>%<pres%>%<cond%>: er%>r V-ImperfIndic-re;		! present conditional

%<c4%>%<pres%>%<subj%>%<1p%>%<sg%>: oi%>e #;		! present subjunctive
%<c4%>%<pres%>%<subj%>%<2p%>%<sg%>: oi%>es #;		! present subjunctive
%<c4%>%<pres%>%<subj%>%<3p%>%<sg%>: oi%>e #;		! present subjunctive
%<c4%>%<pres%>%<subj%>%<2p%>%<pl%>: oy%>iez #;		! present subjunctive
%<c4%>%<pres%>%<subj%>%<3p%>%<pl%>: oi%>ent #;		! present subjunctive


%<c4%>%<imperf%>%<subj%>: iss V-ImperfSubj;			! imperfect subjunctive
%<c4%>%<imperf%>%<subj%>%<3p%>%<sg%>: ît #;			! imperfect subjunctive

%<c4%>%<imper%>%<2p%>%<sg%>: oi%>s #;				! imperative
%<c4%>%<imper%>%<2p%>%<pl%>: oy%>ez #;

LEXICON Verbs
apprendre%<verb%>: ap V-prendre;	! VERB TRANSITIVE "to learn/teach"
pouvoir%<verb%>: V-pouvoir;			! VERB INTRANSITIVE "to be able to, can"
prendre%<verb%>: V-prendre;			! VERB TRANSITIVE/INTRANSITIVE/PRON "to take"
revenir%<verb%>: re V-venir;		! VERB INTRANSITIVE/PRON "to return"
savoir%<verb%>: V-savoir;			! 
sentir%<verb%>: sent V-sortir;		! VERB TRANSITIVE/INTRANSITIVE/PRON "to feel; to smell; to feel"
sortir%<verb%>: sort V-sortir;		! VERB TRANSITIVE/INTRANSITIVE/PRON "to bring out; to come out; to find a way out" SLIGHTLY IRREGULAR
tenir%<verb%>: V-tenir;				! VERB TRANSITIVE/INTRANSITIVE/PRON "to hold"
venir%<verb%>: V-venir;				! VERB INTRANSITIVE/PRON "to come" also viendre
voir%<verb%>: v V-voir;				! VERB TRANSITIVE/INTRANSITIVE/PRON "to see, to endure; to menstruate"
voir%<verb%>: V-voir;
